src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/V-tenevasjTS_gt-norm.yaml
     теневась+V+TV+PrcImprf+PxSg3+Der/Cop+Aor+ScPl3: теневанида
     теневась+V+TV+PrcImprf+PxDu1+Der/Cop+Prt1+ScPl3: теневанининзь
     теневась+V+TV+PrcImprf+PxDu2+Der/Cop+Prt1+ScPl3: теневанидинзь
     теневась+V+TV+PrcImprf+PxDu3+Der/Cop+Prt1+ScPl3: теневанидинзь
     теневась+V+TV+PrcImprf+PxPl1+Der/Cop+Prt1+ScPl3: теневанинаць
     теневась+V+TV+PrcImprf+PxPl2+Der/Cop+Prt1+ScPl3: теневанидаць
     теневась+V+TV+PrcImprf+PxPl3+Der/Cop+Prt1+ScPl3: теневанидонзь
     теневась+V+TV+PrcImprf+PxSg1+Der/Cop+Prt1+ScPl3: теневанинась
     теневась+V+TV+PrcImprf+PxSg2+Der/Cop+Prt1+ScPl3: теневанидась
     теневась+V+TV+PrcImprf+PxSg3+Der/Cop+Prt1+ScPl3: теневанидась
     теневась+V+TV+PrcImprf+Der/Cop+Prt1+ScDu1: теневананинзь
     теневась+V+TV+PrcImprf+Der/Cop+Prt1+ScDu2: теневанадинзь
     теневась+V+TV+PrcImprf+Der/Cop+Prt1+ScDu3: теневанаханзь
     теневась+V+TV+PrcImprf+Der/Cop+Prt1+ScPl1: теневанаваць
     теневась+V+TV+PrcImprf+Der/Cop+Prt1+ScPl2: теневанадаць
     теневась+V+TV+PrcImprf+Der/Cop+Prt1+ScPl3: теневанаць
     теневась+V+TV+PrcImprf+Der/Cop+Prt1+ScSg1: теневанадамзь
     теневась+V+TV+PrcImprf+Der/Cop+Prt1+ScSg2: теневананась
     теневась+V+TV+PrcImprf+Der/Cop+Prt1+ScSg3: теневанась
     теневась+V+TV+PrcImprf+PxDu1+Der/Cop+Aor+ScSg3: теневанамиʼ
     теневась+V+TV+PrcImprf+PxDu2+Der/Cop+Aor+ScSg3: теневанариʼ
     теневась+V+TV+PrcImprf+PxDu3+Der/Cop+Aor+ScSg3: теневанадиʼ
     теневась+V+TV+PrcImprf+PxPl1+Der/Cop+Aor+ScSg3: теневанаваˮ
     теневась+V+TV+PrcImprf+PxPl2+Der/Cop+Aor+ScSg3: теневанараˮ
     теневась+V+TV+PrcImprf+PxPl3+Der/Cop+Aor+ScSg3: теневанадоʼ
     теневась+V+TV+PrcImprf+PxSg1+Der/Cop+Aor+ScSg3: теневанав
     теневась+V+TV+PrcImprf+PxSg2+Der/Cop+Aor+ScSg3: теневанар
     теневась+V+TV+PrcImprf+PxSg3+Der/Cop+Aor+ScSg3: теневанада
     теневась+V+TV+PrcImprf+PxDu1+Der/Cop+Prt1+ScSg3: теневанаминзь
     теневась+V+TV+PrcImprf+PxDu2+Der/Cop+Prt1+ScSg3: теневанаринзь
     теневась+V+TV+PrcImprf+PxDu3+Der/Cop+Prt1+ScSg3: теневанадинзь
     теневась+V+TV+PrcImprf+PxPl1+Der/Cop+Prt1+ScSg3: теневанаваць
     теневась+V+TV+PrcImprf+PxPl2+Der/Cop+Prt1+ScSg3: теневанараць
     теневась+V+TV+PrcImprf+PxPl3+Der/Cop+Prt1+ScSg3: теневанадонзь
     теневась+V+TV+PrcImprf+PxSg1+Der/Cop+Prt1+ScSg3: теневанавась
     теневась+V+TV+PrcImprf+PxSg2+Der/Cop+Prt1+ScSg3: теневанарась
     теневась+V+TV+PrcImprf+PxSg3+Der/Cop+Prt1+ScSg3: теневанадась
     теневась+V+TV+PrcImprf+Du+Acc+Abs: теневанахаʼ
     теневась+V+TV+PrcImprf+Du+Acc+PxDu1: теневанахаюниʼ
     теневась+V+TV+PrcImprf+Du+Acc+PxDu2: теневанахаюдиʼ
     теневась+V+TV+PrcImprf+Du+Acc+PxDu3: теневанахаюдиʼ
     теневась+V+TV+PrcImprf+Du+Acc+PxPl1: теневанахаюнаˮ
     теневась+V+TV+PrcImprf+Du+Acc+PxPl2: теневанахаюдаˮ
     теневась+V+TV+PrcImprf+Du+Acc+PxPl3: теневанахаюдоʼ
#     теневась+V+TV+PrcImprf+Du+Acc+PxSg1.2: теневанахаюни
     теневась+V+TV+PrcImprf+Du+Acc+PxSg1: [теневанахаюн, теневанахаюни]
     теневась+V+TV+PrcImprf+Du+Acc+PxSg2: теневанахаюд
     теневась+V+TV+PrcImprf+Du+Acc+PxSg3: теневанахаюда
     теневась+V+TV+PrcImprf+Du+Gen+Abs: теневанахаʼ
     теневась+V+TV+PrcImprf+Du+Gen+PxDu1: теневанахаюниʼ
     теневась+V+TV+PrcImprf+Du+Gen+PxDu2: теневанахаютиʼ
     теневась+V+TV+PrcImprf+Du+Gen+PxDu3: теневанахаютиʼ
     теневась+V+TV+PrcImprf+Du+Gen+PxPl1: теневанахаюнаˮ
     теневась+V+TV+PrcImprf+Du+Gen+PxPl2: теневанахаютаˮ
     теневась+V+TV+PrcImprf+Du+Gen+PxPl3: теневанахаютоʼ
#     теневась+V+TV+PrcImprf+Du+Gen+PxSg1.2: теневанахаюни
     теневась+V+TV+PrcImprf+Du+Gen+PxSg1: [теневанахаюн, теневанахаюни]
     теневась+V+TV+PrcImprf+Du+Gen+PxSg2: теневанахают
     теневась+V+TV+PrcImprf+Du+Gen+PxSg3: теневанахаюта
     теневась+V+TV+PrcImprf+Du+Nom+Abs: теневанахаʼ
     теневась+V+TV+PrcImprf+Du+Nom+PxDu1: теневанахаюниʼ
     теневась+V+TV+PrcImprf+Du+Nom+PxDu2: теневанахаюдиʼ
     теневась+V+TV+PrcImprf+Du+Nom+PxDu3: теневанахаюдиʼ
     теневась+V+TV+PrcImprf+Du+Nom+PxPl1: теневанахаюнаˮ
     теневась+V+TV+PrcImprf+Du+Nom+PxPl2: теневанахаюдаˮ
     теневась+V+TV+PrcImprf+Du+Nom+PxPl3: теневанахаюдоʼ
#     теневась+V+TV+PrcImprf+Du+Nom+PxSg1.2: теневанахаюни
     теневась+V+TV+PrcImprf+Du+Nom+PxSg1: [теневанахаюн, теневанахаюни]
     теневась+V+TV+PrcImprf+Du+Nom+PxSg2: теневанахаюд
     теневась+V+TV+PrcImprf+Du+Nom+PxSg3: теневанахаюда
     теневась+V+TV+PrcImprf+Equ+Lat: теневанадаревʼ
     теневась+V+TV+PrcImprf+Equ: теневанадаремʼ
     теневась+V+TV+PrcImprf+Pl+Abl+Abs: теневанахат
     теневась+V+TV+PrcImprf+Pl+Abl+PxDu1: [теневанахатаниʼ, теневанахатниʼ]
     теневась+V+TV+PrcImprf+Pl+Abl+PxDu2: [теневанахататиʼ, теневанахаттиʼ]
     теневась+V+TV+PrcImprf+Pl+Abl+PxDu3: [теневанахататиʼ, теневанахаттиʼ]
     теневась+V+TV+PrcImprf+Pl+Abl+PxPl1: [теневанахатанаˮ, теневанахатнаˮ]
     теневась+V+TV+PrcImprf+Pl+Abl+PxPl2: [теневанахататаˮ, теневанахаттаˮ]
     теневась+V+TV+PrcImprf+Pl+Abl+PxPl3: [теневанахататоʼ, теневанахаттоʼ]
#     теневась+V+TV+PrcImprf+Pl+Abl+PxSg1.2: [теневанахатани, теневанахатни]
     теневась+V+TV+PrcImprf+Pl+Abl+PxSg1: [теневанахатан, теневанахатани, теневанахатни]
     теневась+V+TV+PrcImprf+Pl+Abl+PxSg2: теневанахатат
     теневась+V+TV+PrcImprf+Pl+Abl+PxSg3: [теневанахатата, теневанахатта]
     теневась+V+TV+PrcImprf+Pl+Acc+Abs: теневани
     теневась+V+TV+PrcImprf+Pl+Acc+PxDu1: теневаниниʼ
     теневась+V+TV+PrcImprf+Pl+Acc+PxDu2: теневанидиʼ
     теневась+V+TV+PrcImprf+Pl+Acc+PxDu3: теневанидиʼ
     теневась+V+TV+PrcImprf+Pl+Acc+PxPl1: теневанинаˮ
     теневась+V+TV+PrcImprf+Pl+Acc+PxPl2: теневанидаˮ
     теневась+V+TV+PrcImprf+Pl+Acc+PxPl3: теневанидоʼ
#     теневась+V+TV+PrcImprf+Pl+Acc+PxSg1.2: теневанини
     теневась+V+TV+PrcImprf+Pl+Acc+PxSg1: [теневанин, теневанини]
     теневась+V+TV+PrcImprf+Pl+Acc+PxSg2: теневанид
     теневась+V+TV+PrcImprf+Pl+Acc+PxSg3: теневанида
     теневась+V+TV+PrcImprf+Pl+Dat+Abs: теневанахаˮ
     теневась+V+TV+PrcImprf+Pl+Dat+PxDu1: теневанахаˮниʼ
     теневась+V+TV+PrcImprf+Pl+Dat+PxDu2: теневанахатиʼ
     теневась+V+TV+PrcImprf+Pl+Dat+PxDu3: теневанахатиʼ
     теневась+V+TV+PrcImprf+Pl+Dat+PxPl1: теневанахаˮнаˮ
     теневась+V+TV+PrcImprf+Pl+Dat+PxPl2: теневанахатаˮ
     теневась+V+TV+PrcImprf+Pl+Dat+PxPl3: теневанахатоʼ
#     теневась+V+TV+PrcImprf+Pl+Dat+PxSg1.2: теневанахаˮни
     теневась+V+TV+PrcImprf+Pl+Dat+PxSg1: [теневанахаˮн, теневанахаˮни]
     теневась+V+TV+PrcImprf+Pl+Dat+PxSg2: теневанахат
     теневась+V+TV+PrcImprf+Pl+Dat+PxSg3: теневанахата
     теневась+V+TV+PrcImprf+Pl+Gen+Abs: теневаниˮ
     теневась+V+TV+PrcImprf+Pl+Gen+PxDu1: теневаниˮниʼ
     теневась+V+TV+PrcImprf+Pl+Gen+PxDu2: теневанитиʼ
     теневась+V+TV+PrcImprf+Pl+Gen+PxDu3: теневанитиʼ
     теневась+V+TV+PrcImprf+Pl+Gen+PxPl1: теневаниˮнаˮ
     теневась+V+TV+PrcImprf+Pl+Gen+PxPl2: теневанитаˮ
     теневась+V+TV+PrcImprf+Pl+Gen+PxPl3: теневанитоʼ
#     теневась+V+TV+PrcImprf+Pl+Gen+PxSg1.2: теневаниˮни
     теневась+V+TV+PrcImprf+Pl+Gen+PxSg1: [теневаниˮн, теневаниˮни]
     теневась+V+TV+PrcImprf+Pl+Gen+PxSg2: теневанит
     теневась+V+TV+PrcImprf+Pl+Gen+PxSg3: теневанита
     теневась+V+TV+PrcImprf+Pl+Loc+Abs: теневанахаˮна
     теневась+V+TV+PrcImprf+Pl+Loc+PxDu1: теневанахаˮнаниʼ
     теневась+V+TV+PrcImprf+Pl+Loc+PxDu2: теневанахаˮнатиʼ
     теневась+V+TV+PrcImprf+Pl+Loc+PxDu3: теневанахаˮнатиʼ
     теневась+V+TV+PrcImprf+Pl+Loc+PxPl1: теневанахаˮнанаˮ
     теневась+V+TV+PrcImprf+Pl+Loc+PxPl2: теневанахаˮнатаˮ
     теневась+V+TV+PrcImprf+Pl+Loc+PxPl3: теневанахаˮнатоʼ
#     теневась+V+TV+PrcImprf+Pl+Loc+PxSg1.2: теневанахаˮнани
     теневась+V+TV+PrcImprf+Pl+Loc+PxSg1: [теневанахаˮнан, теневанахаˮнани]
     теневась+V+TV+PrcImprf+Pl+Loc+PxSg2: теневанахаˮнат
     теневась+V+TV+PrcImprf+Pl+Loc+PxSg3: теневанахаˮната
     теневась+V+TV+PrcImprf+Pl+Nom+Abs: теневанаˮ
     теневась+V+TV+PrcImprf+Pl+Nom+PxDu1: теневаниниʼ
     теневась+V+TV+PrcImprf+Pl+Nom+PxDu2: теневанидиʼ
     теневась+V+TV+PrcImprf+Pl+Nom+PxDu3: теневанидиʼ
     теневась+V+TV+PrcImprf+Pl+Nom+PxPl1: теневанинаˮ
     теневась+V+TV+PrcImprf+Pl+Nom+PxPl2: теневанидаˮ
     теневась+V+TV+PrcImprf+Pl+Nom+PxPl3: теневанидоʼ
#     теневась+V+TV+PrcImprf+Pl+Nom+PxSg1.2: теневанини
     теневась+V+TV+PrcImprf+Pl+Nom+PxSg1: [теневанин, теневанини]
     теневась+V+TV+PrcImprf+Pl+Nom+PxSg2: теневанид
     теневась+V+TV+PrcImprf+Pl+Nom+PxSg3: теневанида
     теневась+V+TV+PrcImprf+Pl+Pros+Abs: теневаниˮмана
     теневась+V+TV+PrcImprf+Pl+Pros+PxDu1: теневаниˮмананиʼ
     теневась+V+TV+PrcImprf+Pl+Pros+PxDu2: теневаниˮманатиʼ
     теневась+V+TV+PrcImprf+Pl+Pros+PxDu3: теневаниˮманатиʼ
     теневась+V+TV+PrcImprf+Pl+Pros+PxPl1: теневаниˮмананаˮ
     теневась+V+TV+PrcImprf+Pl+Pros+PxPl2: теневаниˮманатаˮ
     теневась+V+TV+PrcImprf+Pl+Pros+PxPl3: теневаниˮманатоʼ
#     теневась+V+TV+PrcImprf+Pl+Pros+PxSg1.2: теневаниˮманани
     теневась+V+TV+PrcImprf+Pl+Pros+PxSg1: [теневаниˮманан, теневаниˮманани]
     теневась+V+TV+PrcImprf+Pl+Pros+PxSg2: теневаниˮманат
     теневась+V+TV+PrcImprf+Pl+Pros+PxSg3: теневаниˮманата
     теневась+V+TV+PrcImprf+Pred+Abs: теневанад
     теневась+V+TV+PrcImprf+Pred+Acc+PxDu1: теневанадамиʼ
     теневась+V+TV+PrcImprf+Pred+Acc+PxDu2: теневанадамдиʼ
     теневась+V+TV+PrcImprf+Pred+Acc+PxDu3: теневанадамдиʼ
     теневась+V+TV+PrcImprf+Pred+Acc+PxPl1: теневанадаваˮ
     теневась+V+TV+PrcImprf+Pred+Acc+PxPl2: теневанадамдаˮ
     теневась+V+TV+PrcImprf+Pred+Acc+PxPl3: теневанадамдоʼ
#     теневась+V+TV+PrcImprf+Pred+Acc+PxSg1.2: теневанадами
     теневась+V+TV+PrcImprf+Pred+Acc+PxSg1: [теневанадав, теневанадув, теневанадами]
     теневась+V+TV+PrcImprf+Pred+Acc+PxSg2: теневанадамд
     теневась+V+TV+PrcImprf+Pred+Acc+PxSg3: теневанадамда
     теневась+V+TV+PrcImprf+Pred+Gen+PxDu1: теневанаданиʼ
     теневась+V+TV+PrcImprf+Pred+Gen+PxDu2: теневанадандиʼ
     теневась+V+TV+PrcImprf+Pred+Gen+PxDu3: теневанадандиʼ
     теневась+V+TV+PrcImprf+Pred+Gen+PxPl1: теневанаданаˮ
     теневась+V+TV+PrcImprf+Pred+Gen+PxPl2: теневанадандаˮ
     теневась+V+TV+PrcImprf+Pred+Gen+PxPl3: теневанадандоʼ
#     теневась+V+TV+PrcImprf+Pred+Gen+PxSg1.2: теневанадани
     теневась+V+TV+PrcImprf+Pred+Gen+PxSg1: [теневанадан, теневанадани]
     теневась+V+TV+PrcImprf+Pred+Gen+PxSg2: теневанаданд
     теневась+V+TV+PrcImprf+Pred+Gen+PxSg3: теневанаданда
     теневась+V+TV+PrcImprf+Pred+Nom+PxDu1: теневанадамиʼ
     теневась+V+TV+PrcImprf+Pred+Nom+PxDu2: теневанадариʼ
     теневась+V+TV+PrcImprf+Pred+Nom+PxDu3: теневанададиʼ
     теневась+V+TV+PrcImprf+Pred+Nom+PxPl1: теневанадаваˮ
     теневась+V+TV+PrcImprf+Pred+Nom+PxPl2: теневанадараˮ
     теневась+V+TV+PrcImprf+Pred+Nom+PxPl3: теневанададоʼ
#     теневась+V+TV+PrcImprf+Pred+Nom+PxSg1.2: теневанадами
     теневась+V+TV+PrcImprf+Pred+Nom+PxSg1: [теневанадав, теневанадув, теневанадами]
     теневась+V+TV+PrcImprf+Pred+Nom+PxSg2: теневанадар
     теневась+V+TV+PrcImprf+Pred+Nom+PxSg3: теневанадада
     теневась+V+TV+PrcImprf+Sg+Abl+Abs: теневанахад
     теневась+V+TV+PrcImprf+Sg+Abl+PxDu1: [теневанахаданиʼ, теневанахадниʼ]
     теневась+V+TV+PrcImprf+Sg+Abl+PxDu2: теневанахадандиʼ
     теневась+V+TV+PrcImprf+Sg+Abl+PxDu3: теневанахадандиʼ
     теневась+V+TV+PrcImprf+Sg+Abl+PxPl1: [теневанахаданаˮ, теневанахаднаˮ]
     теневась+V+TV+PrcImprf+Sg+Abl+PxPl2: теневанахадандаˮ
     теневась+V+TV+PrcImprf+Sg+Abl+PxPl3: теневанахадандоʼ
#     теневась+V+TV+PrcImprf+Sg+Abl+PxSg1.2: [теневанахадани, теневанахадни]
     теневась+V+TV+PrcImprf+Sg+Abl+PxSg1: [теневанахадан, теневанахадани, теневанахадни]
     теневась+V+TV+PrcImprf+Sg+Abl+PxSg2: теневанахаданд
     теневась+V+TV+PrcImprf+Sg+Abl+PxSg3: теневанахаданда
     теневась+V+TV+PrcImprf+Sg+Acc+Abs: теневанамʼ
     теневась+V+TV+PrcImprf+Sg+Acc+PxDu1: теневанамиʼ
     теневась+V+TV+PrcImprf+Sg+Acc+PxDu2: теневанамдиʼ
     теневась+V+TV+PrcImprf+Sg+Acc+PxDu3: теневанамдиʼ
     теневась+V+TV+PrcImprf+Sg+Acc+PxPl1: теневанаваˮ
     теневась+V+TV+PrcImprf+Sg+Acc+PxPl2: теневанамдаˮ
     теневась+V+TV+PrcImprf+Sg+Acc+PxPl3: теневанамдоʼ
